Washington statutes.
RCW 4.24.720

Liability immunity—Amber alerts.

No cause of action shall be maintained for civil damages in any court of this state against any radio or television broadcasting station or cable television system, or the employees, officers, directors, managers, or agents of the radio or television broadcasting station or cable television system, based on the broadcast of information including, but not limited to, the name or description of an abducted child, the name or description of a suspected abductor, and the circumstances of an abduction supplied by law enforcement officials pursuant to the voluntary broadcast notification system commonly known as the "Amber alert," or as the same system may otherwise be known in this state, which is used to notify the public of missing or abducted children. Nothing in this section shall be construed to limit or restrict in any way any immunity or privilege a radio or television broadcasting station or cable television system may have under statute or common law for broadcasting or otherwise disseminating information.

[ 2005 c 128 s 1.]